cs: Způsob upevnění měřidla: Montáž na držák; Zapuštěná montáž; Průběžná (hadice / palivové potrubí); Montáž na panel; Povrchová montáž; Montáž na nádrž; Univerzální / více možností montáže; Ostatní
hu: Műszer rögzítési típusa: Konzolos rögzítés; Süllyesztett rögzítés; Soros (tömlő/üzemanyagcső); Panelbe szerelhető; Felületre szerelhető; Tartálytetőre szerelhető; Univerzális / több rögzítési lehetőség; Egyéb
ko: 계기판 장착 유형: 브래킷 마운트; 플러시 마운트; 인라인(호스/연료 라인); 패널 마운트; 서피스 마운트; 탱크탑 마운트; 범용/다중 장착 옵션; 기타
en: Gauge mounting type: Bracket mount; Flush mount; In-line (hose/fuel line); Panel mount; Surface mount; Tank-top mount; Universal/Multiple mounting options; Other
ru: Тип крепления датчика: Крепление на кронштейне; Установка заподлицо; Встроенный (шланг/топливопровод); Панельный монтаж; Накладной монтаж; Крепление на крышке бака; Универсальное / несколько вариантов крепления; Другое
nl: Type metermontage: Beugelmontage; Inbouwmontage; In-line (slang/brandstofleiding); Paneelmontage; Opbouwmontage; Tanktopmontage; Universeel/meerdere montageopties; Overig
ro-RO: Tip de montare a manometrului: Montare pe suport; Montare la nivel; În linie (furtun/conductă de combustibil); Montare pe panou; Montare pe suprafață; Montare deasupra rezervorului; Universal/Opțiuni multiple de montare; Altele
sv: Fästtyp för mätare: Montering med fäste; Infälld montering; In-line (slang/bränsleslang); Panelmontering; Utanpåliggande montering; Toppmontering (tank); Universell/flera monteringsalternativ; Övrigt
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งเกจวัด: ขายึด; ติดตั้งแบบฝัง; ในสาย (ท่อ/สายน้ำมันเชื้อเพลิง); ติดตั้งบนแผงควบคุม; ติดตั้งบนพื้นผิว; ติดตั้งบนถัง; อเนกประสงค์/หลายตัวเลือกการติดตั้ง; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Typ montáže meradla: Montáž na držiak; Zápustná montáž; In-line (hadica/palivové potrubie); Montáž na panel; Povrchová montáž; Montáž na vrch nádrže; Univerzálne / viacero možností montáže; Iné
ja: ゲージマウントタイプ: ブラケットマウント; フラッシュマウント; インライン (ホース/燃料ライン); パネルマウント; サーフェスマウント; タンクトップマウント; ユニバーサル/マルチマウントオプション; その他
da: Målermonteringstype: Montering med beslag; Planforsænket montering; In-line (slange/brændstofrør); Panelmontering; Overflademontering; Montering øverst på tank; Universal/flere monteringsmuligheder; Andet
fr: Type de montage du manomètre: Montage sur support; Montage encastré; En ligne (tuyau/conduite de carburant); Montage sur panneau; Montage en surface; Montage sur réservoir; Universel/Multiples options de montage; Autre
es: Tipo de montaje del calibre: Montaje con soporte; Montaje al ras; En línea (manguera/línea de combustible); Montaje en panel; Montaje en superficie; Montaje en parte superior del tanque; Opciones de montaje universal/múltiple; Otro
bg-BG: Монтаж на манометър: Монтаж със скоба; Монтаж на ниво; Линеен (маркуч/горивна линия); Монтаж на панел; Повърхностен монтаж; Монтаж на горната част на резервоара; Универсални/множество опции за монтаж; Друго
it: Tipo di montaggio dello strumento di misura: Montaggio a staffa; Montaggio a filo; In linea (tubo/tubo del carburante); Montaggio a pannello; Montaggio su superficie; Montaggio sopra il serbatoio; Universale/più opzioni di montaggio; Altro
zh-TW: 儀表安裝類型: 支架安裝; 平齊安裝; 直列式 (軟管/燃油管); 面板安裝; 表面安裝; 油箱頂部安裝; 通用/多種安裝選項; 其他
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης μετρητή: Στήριξη με βραχίονα; Χωνευτή τοποθέτηση; Ενδιάμεση τοποθέτηση (σωλήνας/γραμμή καυσίμου); Τοποθέτηση σε πάνελ; Επιφανειακή τοποθέτηση; Τοποθέτηση στην κορυφή της δεξαμενής; Universal/Πολλαπλές επιλογές τοποθέτησης; Άλλο
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem do medidor: Montagem em suporte; Montagem embutida; Em linha (mangueira/linha de combustível); Montagem em painel; Montagem em superfície; Montagem superior do tanque; Universal/Múltiplas opções de montagem; Outro
de: Montageart für Messgerät: Halterungsmontage; Bündige Montage; In-Line (Schlauch/Kraftstoffleitung); Panelmontage; Oberflächenmontage; Tankaufbaumontage; Universell/Mehrere Montageoptionen; Sonstige
hr-HR: Vrsta montaže mjerača: Montaža na nosač; Ugradbena montaža; Linijska (crijevo / vod goriva); Montaža na ploču; Nadgradna montaža; Montaža na vrh spremnika; Univerzalna / više opcija montaže; Ostalo
fi: Mittarin kiinnitystyyppi: Kiinnikekiinnitys; Uppoasennus; Linjan sisäinen (letku/polttoaineletku); Paneeliasennus; Pinta-asennus; Säiliön päälle asennus; Yleiskäyttöinen / useita asennusvaihtoehtoja; Muu
zh-CN: 仪表安装类型: 支架安装; 齐平安装; 管线内（软管/燃油管线）; 面板安装; 表面安装; 罐顶安装; 通用/多种安装选项; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem do medidor: Montagem em suporte; Montagem embutida; Em linha (mangueira/linha de combustível); Montagem em painel; Montagem saliente; Montagem no topo do tanque; Opções de montagem universais/múltiplas; Outra
nb: Monterinstype for måler: Brakettmontering; Innfelt montering; In-line (slange/drivstoffrør); Panelmontering; Utenpåliggende montering; Toppmontering på tank; Universal/flere monteringsalternativer; Annet
pl: Typ mocowania przyrządu pomiarowego: Montaż na wsporniku; Montaż wpuszczany; W przewodzie (wąż/przewód paliwowy); Montaż panelowy; Montaż natynkowy (powierzchniowy); Montaż na górze zbiornika; Uniwersalny / Wiele opcji montażu; Inny
vi: Kiểu lắp đặt đồng hồ đo: Gắn giá đỡ; Gắn chìm; Lắp nối tiếp (ống/đường nhiên liệu); Gắn bảng điều khiển; Gắn nổi; Gắn nắp bình chứa; Phổ thông/Nhiều tùy chọn gắn; Khác
lt-LT: Matuoklio montavimo tipas: Tvirtinamas laikikliu; Įleidžiamas; Linijoje (žarna / kuro magistralė); Tvirtinamas skyde; Paviršinis; Ant bako viršaus; Universalu / keli tvirtinimo būdai; Kita
tr: Gösterge montaj tipi: Braket montajı; Gömme montaj; Hat içi (hortum/yakıt hattı); Panel montajı; Yüzey montajı; Depo üstü montajı; Evrensel/Çoklu montaj seçenekleri; Diğer
sl-SI: Vrsta montaže merilnika: Montaža z nosilcem; Poravnana montaža; Linijska (cev/vod za gorivo); Montaža na ploščo; Nadometna montaža; Montaža na vrh rezervoarja; Univerzalna/več možnosti montaže; Drugo